Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4114.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 910. With regard to approving, denying, or suspending a license under this act, the commission shall not consider a violation if at least 3 years have elapsed since the act that resulted in the violation unless the violation resulted in the revocation of a license.